Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF1886.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [325M.40] DISCLOSURE OF ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Definition. new text end new text begin For the purpose of this section, "artificial intelligence" means a machine-based system that, for an explicit or implicit objective, infers from the inputs the system receives how to generate outputs, including content, decisions, predictions, and recommendations, that have the ability to influence physical or virtual environments. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Disclosure requirement. new text end new text begin A person engages in an unfair or deceptive trade practice when, in the course of business, the person fails to disclose that an individual is communicating or interacting with artificial intelligence that engages in a textual or aural conversation. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Deceptive conduct. new text end new text begin A person engages in an unfair or deceptive trade practice when, in the course of business, the person misleads or deceives a reasonable individual to believe the individual is engaging with an actual human and: new text end new text begin (1) the individual is not notified in a clear and conspicuous manner that the individual is communicating with artificial intelligence; or new text end new text begin (2) the individual reasonably believes the individual is engaging with a human. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Opt-out. new text end new text begin A person who uses artificial intelligence in the course of business must provide individuals with an option to communicate or interact with an actual human instead of artificial intelligence, including but not limited to through electronic communication, an audio or video call, or an in-person meeting. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Remedies; enforcement. new text end new text begin (a) An individual injured by a violation of this section may bring a civil action for damages, statutory damages not to exceed $1,000, injunctive relief, and costs and reasonable attorney fees. new text end new text begin (b) The attorney general may enforce this section under section 8.31. In an action brought under this paragraph, a person is liable for a civil penalty not to exceed $5,000,000. new text end